ga/braille/ga-g1.utb
# liblouis: Irish (Gaeilge)  Uncontracted Braille Table
# www.inbaf.ie Irish Uncontracted Braille   Version 1.1 27th April 2015
# Braille Gaelach gan ghiorrúchán
#  This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#   under the terms of the Lesser or Library GNU General Public License 
#  as published by the Free Software Foundation; version 2.1.
# 
#  This file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the 
#  Library GNU General Public License for more details.
#
# Copyright (C) 2014 Ronan McGuirk, <ronan.p.mcguirk@gmail.com>.
#
# Maintained by Ronan McGuirk, <ronan.p.mcguirk@gmail.com>
# Supervised by Mesar Hameed <mesar.hameed@gmail.com>

include text_nabcc.dis All display opcodes
include ukchardefs.cti
punctuation • 456-256	# filled round bullet point

# Braille indicators
numsign 3456  number sign, just a dots operand
capsign 6
begcaps 6-6
endcaps 6-3
begital 46-2356
endital 46-3
begbold 45-2356
endbold 45-3

# the decimal digits
include litdigits6Dots.uti
 

#single letter words
word I 24
word o 135
word O 135

# punctuation
prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
always " 6-2356
prepunc ' 6-236
postpunc ' 6-356
postpunc '' 356
postpunc ''' 356-3-356

always ' 3
always , 2
midnum . 256
decpoint . 256
always . 256
always ; 23
always : 25
always ! 235
always # 456-1456
midnum / 34-3456
always / 456-34
always ? 236
always % 46-356
always ^ 4-26
always ~ 4-35
always & 234
midnum * 5-236-3456
always * 5-35
repeated *** 5-35-5-35-5-35
always ( 5-126
always ) 5-345
always [ 46-126
always ] 46-345
always { 456-126
always } 456-345
always _ 46-36
prepunc `` 236
prepunc ` 6-236
always ` 46-16
always @ 4-1
always \\ 456-16
always | 456-1256
repeated --- 6-36-6-36-6-36

repeated ___ 46-36-46-36-46-36


repeated ::: 25-25-25

repeated === 5-2356-5-2356-5-2356
repeated ~~~ 4-35-4-35-4-35
always \s-\s 6-36
always ... 256-256-256
always .\s.\s. 256-256-256 . . .
always  \x2026 256-256-256 # 8230			MS Word smart ellipsis
always • 456-256   # bullet point 

# the hyphen
repeated ­­­ 36-36-36
always \s­\s 36-36


# Irish long accent signs sínte fada 
uplow Áá 12346				# á a fada (a with acute accent sign)
uplow Éé 123456				# é e fada (e with acute accent sign)
uplow Íí 12356				# í i fada, (i with acute accent)
uplow Óó 2346			# ó o fada (o with acute accent sign)
uplow Úú 23456			#ú u fada (u with acute accent)

# non-Irish letter symbols

uplow Àà 1				# a with grave
uplow Ââ 1				# a with circumflex
uplow Ãã 1				# a with tilde
uplow Ää 1				# a with dieresis
uplow Åå 1				# a with ring above
uplow Ææ 1				# letter ae
uplow Çç 14				# c with cedilla
uplow Èè 15				# e with grave
uplow Êê 15				# e with circumflex
uplow Ëë 15				# e with dieresis
uplow Ìì 24				# i with grave above
uplow Îî 24				# i with circumflex
uplow Ïï 24				# i with dieresis
uplow Ðð 15				# letter eth
uplow Ññ 1345			# n with tilde
uplow Òò 135			# o with grave above
uplow Ôô 135			# o with circumflex
uplow Õõ 135			# o with tilde
uplow Öö 135			# o with dieresis
uplow Øø 135			# o with stroke
uplow Ùù 136			# u with grave above
uplow Ûû 136			# u with circumflex above
uplow Üü 136				# u with dieeresis
uplow Ýý 13456		# y with acute above
uplow Þþ 2345			# letter thorn
letter ß 2346		# small sharp s
uplow Ŵŵ 2456 w with circumflex
uplow Ŷŷ 13456 # y with circumflex
uplow Ÿÿ 13456 # y with diaeresis
uplow Ỳỳ 13456 # y with grave

largesign À 45-16-1      [C0] upper a grave
largesign à   45-16-1      [E0] lower a grave


largesign Â 45-146-1      [C2] upper a circumflex
largesign â   45-146-1      [E2] lower a circumflex

largesign Ã 45-12456-1      [C3] upper a tilde
largesign ã   45-12456-1      [E3] lower a tilde

largesign Ä 45-25-1      [C4] upper a dieresis
largesign ä   45-25-1      [E4] lower a dieresis

largesign Å 45-1246-1      [C5] upper a ring
largesign å   45-1246-1      [E5] lower a ring

largesign Æ 1-45-235-15     [C6] upper ae
largesign æ   1-45-235-15			[E6] lower ae

largesign Ç 45-12346-14     [C7] upper c cedilla
largesign ç   45-12346-14     [E7] lower c cedilla

largesign È 45-16-15     [C8] upper e grave
largesign è   45-16-15     [E8] lower e grave

#dlargesign \x00E9   45-34-15     [E9] lower e acute

largesign Ê 45-146-15     [CA] upper e circumflex
largesign ê   45-146-15     [EA] lower e circumflex

largesign Ë 45-25-15     [CB] upper e dieresis
largesign ë   45-25-15     [EB] lower e dieresis

largesign Ì 45-16-24     [CC] upper i grave
largesign ì   45-16-24     [EC] lower i grave


largesign Î 45-146-24     [CE] upper i circumflex
largesign î   45-146-24     [EE] lower i circumflex

largesign Ï 45-25-24     [CF] upper i dieresis
largesign ï   45-25-24     [EF] lower i dieresis


largesign Ñ 45-12456-1345   [D1] upper n tilde
largesign ñ   45-12456-1345   [F1] lower n tilde

largesign Ò 45-16-135    [D2] upper o grave
largesign ò   45-16-135    [F2] lower o grave

#dlargesign \x00F3   45-34-135    [F3] lower o acute

largesign Ô 45-146-135    [D4] upper o circumflex
largesign ô   45-146-135    [F4] lower o circumflex

largesign Õ 45-12456-135    [D5] upper o tilde
largesign õ   45-12456-135    [F5] lower o tilde

largesign Ö 45-25-135    [D6] upper o dieresis
largesign ö   45-25-135			[F6] lower o dieresis

#largesign \x00f8   4-135    [F8] lower o slash

largesign Ù 45-16-136    [D9] upper u grave
largesign ù   45-16-136    [F9] lower u grave

#dlargesign \x00FA   45-25-136    [FA] lower u acute

largesign Û 45-146-136    [DB] upper u circumflex
largesign û   45-146-136    [FB] lower u circumflex

largesign Ü 45-25-136    [DC] upper u dieresis
largesign ü   45-25-136    [FC] lower u dieresis

largesign Ý 45-34-13456  [DD] upper y acute
largesign ý   45-34-13456  [FD] lower y acute


largesign ß 234-234 (DF) lower ss

largesign Ŵ 45-146-2456 lower w circumflex
largesign ŵ 45-146-2456 upper w circumflex

largesign Ŷ 45-146-13456 upper y circumflex
largesign ŷ 45-146-13456 lower y circumflex

largesign Ÿ 45-26-13456 upper y dieresis
largesign ÿ 45-25-13456 lower y dieresis

#largesign \x1EF3 45-16-13456 lower y with grave

# always	\x2010 36		 # 8208			hyphen
hyphen 	\x2010 36		 # 8208			hyphen

# always	\x2011 46		 # 8209			non-breaking hyphen
punctuation ‑ 36		 # 8209			non-breaking hyphen

always	\x2013 5-36		 # 8211		smart minus sign


always	\x201C 45-236	 # 8220			smart opening double quote
always	\x201D 45-356	 # 8221			smart closing double quote
always	\x201E 236	 # 8222			smart double low quotation mark
always	\x201F 356	 # 8223			smart double high reverse quotation mark

# mathematical symbols
decpoint . 256
always < 4-126
always = 5-2356
midnum = 5-2356-3456
always > 4-345
always + 5-235
midnum + 5-235-3456
midnum - 36-3456
always - 36
always × 5-236
midnum × 5-236-3456
midnum ÷ 5-34-3456 division sign
always ÷ 5-34



# other special characters
always © 45-14 copyright
sign  45-2345 trademark
sign ® 45-1235 registered
always ¶ 45-1234 paragraph
always § 45-234 section
always ° 45-245 degrees
always £ 4-123 pounds
always $ 4-234
always ¢ 4-14 cents
sign  4-15	euro
always  4-15	euro
always ¥ 4-13456 yen
always µ 46-134 mu
